Louisiana, session 2026, HB639.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1463.1(D) and (E) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
18:1463.1(F), (G), and (H) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1463.1. Telephone campaign communications; disclosure
* * *
D. No person shall make or cause to be made any telephone call or
automated call provided for in this Section which is created using artificial
intelligence, using the voice of a public figure, including an elected official or
limited public figure, without providing a clear and understandable disclosure at the
beginning of the call that it was created using artificial intelligence.
E. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" shall have the same meaning as provided in R.S.
14:73.14.
(1) (2) "Automated call" includes any call using a prerecorded or artificial
voice as part of a calling campaign to deliver information.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 639 ENROLLED
(2) (3) "Candidate", "person", "political committee" or "committee",
"principal campaign committee", "subsidiary committee", and "public office" shall
have the meanings provided in R.S. 18:1483.
(3) (4) "Elected public official" means an individual who holds public office
in this state or any other state in the United States or holds any federal office.
(5) "Limited public figure" means a person who is not a household name but
has found themselves in the forefront of a public controversy.
(4) (6) "Message testing" means studying for research purposes how
individuals react to positive or negative information on a candidate, elected public
official, or ballot proposition.
(7) "Public figure" means a person who is intimately involved in the
resolution of important public questions, or by reason of his fame shapes events in
areas of concern to society, a famous person, or person of prominence who performs
services at discrete events, such as speeches, public appearances, or similar events,
for compensation on a per-event basis.
F. The provisions of this Section shall not impose liability on any of the
following entities as a result of content provided by another person:
(1) An interactive computer service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 230.
(2) An internet service provider, cloud provider, cybersecurity provider, or
any provider of an information service as defined by 47 U.S.C. 153(24) or a
telecommunications service as defined by 47 U.S.C. 153(53).
(3) A radio or television broadcaster, including a cable or satellite television
operator, programmer, or producer.
E. G. Whoever violates any provision of this Section may be punished by a
civil fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars. Upon a second or
subsequent violation, the penalty shall be a civil fine not to exceed five thousand
dollars.
H. The Board of Ethics shall administer and enforce the provisions of this
Section.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 639 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 42:1132(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1132. Board of Ethics
* * *
D. Additional Jurisdiction. The Board of Ethics shall administer and enforce
the provisions of R.S. 18:1463.1, R.S. 27:63, 96, 226, 261, 316, and 373, and 442,
Part III of Chapter 1 of Title 24 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, Part IV
of Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, Chapter 46 of
Title 33 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, and R.S. 47:9072.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.